fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kodinkoneet: Ilmastointi; Lattian ja maton kuivaimet; Lattia- ja höyrypesurit; Lattiankiillotuskoneet ja -puhdistimet; Futonkuivaajat; Autotallin ovien ohjauspaneelit ja kauko-ohjaimet; Autotallin oven avausjärjestelmät; Pyykinpesulaitteet; Ultraäänipesurit; Imurit; Tapetinpoistajat; Vedenlämmittimet
it: Casa e giardino > Dispositivi elettrodomestici: Controllo climatizzazione; Asciugatori per pavimenti e tappeti; Pulitrici a vapore e lavapavimenti; Lucidatrici e pulitrici pavimenti; Asciugatori futon; Telecomandi e tastierini per portoni da garage; Aperture porte garage; Dispositivi lavanderia; Strumenti di pulizia a ultrasuoni; Aspirapolvere; Sverniciatore a vapore per carta da parati; Riscaldatori acqua
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsapparater: Klimakontrollapparater; Gulv- og teppetørkere; Gulv- og damprensere; Gulvpoleringsmaskiner og poleringsskiver; Sofatørkere; Tastaturer og fjernkontroller til garasjedører; Garasjedøråpnere; Klesapparater; Ultrasoniske rensere; Støvsugere; Tapetdampere; Vannvarmere
th: บ้านและสวน > เครื่องใช้ภายในบ้าน: อุปกรณ์ควบคุมสภาพอากาศ; เครื่องเป่าแห้งสำหรับพื้นและพรม; เครื่องทำความสะอาดพื้นแบบไอน้ำ; เครื่องขัดและเครื่องขัดเงาพื้น; เครื่องเป่าฟูกให้แห้ง; แป้นตัวเลขและรีโมตของประตูโรงรถ; อุปกรณ์เปิดปิดประตูโรงรถ; เครื่องซัก; ที่ทำความสะอาดด้วยคลื่นความถี่สูง; เครื่องดูดฝุ่น; อุปกรณ์ไอน้ำสำหรับกระดาษปิดฝาผนัง; เครื่องให้ความร้อนกับน้ำ
en: Home & Garden > Household Appliances: Climate Control Appliances; Floor & Carpet Dryers; Floor & Steam Cleaners; Floor Polishers & Buffers; Futon Dryers; Garage Door Keypads & Remotes; Garage Door Openers; Laundry Appliances; Ultrasonic Cleaners; Vacuums; Wallpaper Steamers; Water Heaters
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási gépek: Klímaszabályozási készülékek; Padló- és szőnyegszárítók; Padló- és gőztisztítók; Padlópolírozók és -fényesítők; Futonszárítók; Garázskapu-billentyűzetek és -távirányítók; Garázskapu-nyitók; Mosási berendezések; Ultrahangos tisztítók; Porszívók; Háttérképgőzölők; Vízmelegítők
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski aparati: Naprave za nadzor klime; Naprave za sušenje tal in preprog; Čistilci za tla in parni čistilci; Polirniki in brusilniki za tla; Sušilniki za postelje; Ključavnice in daljinski upravljalniki za garažna vrata; Pogonski mehanizmi za garažna vrata; Pralni stroji; Ultrazvočni čistilci; Sesalniki; Parni odstranjevalci tapet; Bojlerji
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Οικιακές συσκευές: Συσκευές ελέγχου κλίματος; Στεγνωτήρες δαπέδου & χαλιών; Καθαριστές δαπέδου & ατμού; Στίλβωτρα & εργαλεία στίλβωσης δαπέδου; Στεγνωτήρες φουτόν; Πληκτρολόγια & τηλεχειριστήρια γκαραζόπορτας; Ανοιχτήρες γκαραζόπορτας; Συσκευές πλυντηρίου; Καθαριστικά με υπερήχους; Ηλεκτρικές σκούπες; Ατμοκαθαριστές ταπετσαριών; Θερμοσίφωνες
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Electrocasnice: Aparate de climatizare; Uscătoare pentru podea și covoare; Dispozitive de curățat podeaua și dispozitive de curățare cu abur; Aparate pentru lustruit și frecat pardoseli; Aparate pentru uscat saltele japoneze; Tastaturi numerice și telecomenzi pentru uși de garaj; Dispozitive pentru deschiderea ușilor de garaj; Electrocasnice pentru rufe; Aparate de curățat cu ultrasunete; Aspiratoare; Aparate de curățat tapetul cu aburi; Încălzitoare de apă
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 家用電器: 空調設備; 地板/地毯除溼家電; 蒸氣清潔機; 地板拋光機; 烘被機; 車庫門鍵盤鎖和遙控器; 車庫門開門機; 洗衣設備; 超音波清潔用品; 吸塵器; 壁紙蒸氣清洗機; 熱水器
cs: Dům a zahrada > Domácí spotřebiče: Klimatizační zařízení; Vysoušeče koberců a podlah; Čističe podlah a parní čističe; Čističe a leštiče podlah; Ohřívače futonových matrací; Tlačítkové a dálkové ovládání garážových vrat; Otvírače garážových vrat; Prací zařízení; Ultrazvukové čističky; Vysavače; Napařovače na tapety; Ohřívače vody, bojlery
ru: Дом и сад > Бытовая техника: Климатическая техника; Фены для сушки полов и ковров; Техника для влажной уборки полов и ковров; Полировальные машины и полотеры; Устройства для сушки футонов; Пульты ДУ и кнопочные панели для гаражных ворот; Системы открывания для гаражных ворот; Техника для стирки, сушки и глажки; Ультразвуковые мойки; Пылесосы; Отпариватели для обоев; Водонагреватели
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke apparaten: Klimaatregeling; Vloer- en tapijtdrogers; Tapijtstomers; Boen- en polijstmachines voor vloeren; Futondrogers; Toetsenpanelen en afstandsbedieningen voor garagedeuren; Garagedeuropeners; Wasmachines; Ultrasone reinigers; Stofzuigers; Behangafstomers; Boilers
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家用电器: 环境调节设备; 地板/地毯吹干机; 电动蒸汽拖把; 地板抛光机; 被褥干燥机; 车库门键盘锁/遥控器; 车库开门器; 洗衣设备; 超声波清洁器; 真空吸尘器; 剥墙纸用蒸汽机; 热水器
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 가전 제품: 냉난방 가전; 바닥/카펫 건조기; 바닥/스팀 청소기; 바닥 광택기; 이불 건조기; 차고 문 키패드/리모컨; 차고문 개폐 장치; 세탁 가전 제품; 초음파 세척기; 진공청소기; 벽지용 스팀기; 온수기
fr: Maison et jardin > Appareils électroménagers: Chauffage et climatisation; Séchoirs pour sols et tapis; Nettoyeurs de sols et vapeur; Polisseuses à plancher; Séchoirs pour futons; Pavés numériques et télécommandes pour portes de garage; Systèmes d’ouverture pour portes de garage; Appareils de blanchisserie; Nettoyeurs à ultrasons; Aspirateurs; Décolleuses à papier peint; Chauffe-eau
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsapparater: Apparater för klimatkontroll; Golv- och mattorkare; Maskiner för ångrengöring av mattor; Maskiner för vaxning och polering av golv; Futontorkare; Fjärrkontroller till garagedörrar; Garagedörröppnare; Maskiner för tvätt och strykning; Ultraljudstvätt; Dammsugare; Tapetångare; Varmvattenberedare
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Домакински уреди: Уреди за контрол на климата; Сушилни за подове и килими; Уреди за почистване на подове и парочистачки; Машини за полиране и полиране на под; Сушилни за легла футон; Клавиатури и дистанционни за гаражни врати; Устройства за отваряне на гаражни врати; Перални уреди; Ултразвукови почистващи препарати; Прахосмукачки; Прахосмукачки за тапети; Бойлери
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 家電: 冷暖房空調設備; 床・カーペット用乾燥機; カーペット用スチームクリーナー; 床洗浄機; 布団乾燥機; ガレージシャッター用テンキースイッチ・リモコン; ガレージシャッター開閉装置; ランドリー家電; 超音波洗浄器; 掃除機; 壁紙用スチーマー; 湯沸器・給湯器
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsapparater: Klimakontroludstyr; Gulv- og tæppetørrere; Gulv- og damprensere; Gulvpolering og gulvpoleringsmaskiner; Futontørreapparat; Fjernbetjeninger til garageporte; Garageportsåbner; Vasketøjsmaskiner; Rengøringsapparater med ultralyd; Vand- og støvsugere; Tapetdampere; Vandvarmere
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsgeräte: Klimatisierung; Boden- & Teppichtrockner; Teppich- & Dampfreinigungsgeräte; Bohner- & Poliermaschinen; Futontrockner; Garagentoröffner; Garagentorantrieb; Waschen & Trocknen; Ultraschallreiniger; Staubsauger; Dampf-Tapetenlöser; Heißwasserboiler
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Domáce spotrebiče: Klimatizačné spotrebiče; Sušičky na podlahy a koberce; Parné čističe na podlahy; Leštičky a pufre na podlahy; Futonové sušičky; Kódové klávesnice a diaľkové ovládače garážových brán; Otvárače garážových brán; Spotrebiče pre starostlivosť o bielizeň; Ultrazvukové čističe; Vysávače; Parné čističe na odstraňovanie tapiet; Ohrievače vody
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Eletrodomésticos: Equipamento de controlo climático; Secadores de chão e carpetes; Dispositivos de limpeza a vapor e de chão; Dispositivos de polimento do chão; Dispositivos para secar futons; Teclados e controlos de portões de garagem; Dispositivos de abertura de portões de garagem; Eletrodomésticos para a roupa; Dispositivos de limpeza ultrassónica; Dispositivos de limpeza a vapor; Removedores de papel de parede a vapor; Aquecedor de água
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Eletrodomésticos: Controle climático; Secadores de piso e carpete; Limpadores de carpete a vapor; Polidores de piso; Secadores de futons; Controles remotos para porta de garagem; Abridores de porta de garagem; Eletrodomésticos para lavanderia; Limpadores ultrassônicos; Aspiradores de pó; Ferros para papel de parede; Aquecedores de água
vi: Nhà và vườn > Thiết bị gia dụng: Thiết bị điều hòa không khí; Máy làm khô sàn và thảm; Thiết bị làm sạch bằng hơi nước; Máy đánh bóng sàn; Máy sấy đệm Futon; Tấm phím và điều khiển từ xa cửa garage; Thiết bị đóng mở cửa gara; Thiết bị giặt là; Thiết bị làm sạch bằng siêu âm; Máy hút bụi; Máy hơi nước gỡ giấy dán tường; Thiết bị đun nước nóng
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Buitinė technika: Klimato kontrolės prietaisai; Grindų ir kilimų džiovintuvai; Grindų ir gariniai valymo įrenginiai; Grindų poliruokliai ir vaškas; Futonų džiovintuvai; Garažo vartų mygtukinės spynos ir nuotolinio valdymo pultai; Garažo vartų atidarymo mechanizmai; Skalbimo prietaisai; Ultragarsiniai valymo įrenginiai; Dulkių siurbliai; Gariniai tapetų valymo prietaisai; Vandens šildytuvai
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Aletleri: Hava Kontrol Aygıtları; Halı ve Kilim Kurutucular; Zemin Temizleyiciler ve Buharlı Temizleyiciler; Zemin Cilalayıcılar ve Perdahlayıcılar; Futon Kurutucular; Garaj Kapısı Tuş Takımları ve Uzaktan Kumandaları; Garaj Kapısı Açıcılar; Çamaşırhane Makineleri; Yüksek Frekanslı Temizleyiciler; Elektrik Süpürgeleri; Buharlı Duvar Kağıdı Sökme Makineleri; Termosifonlar
es: Casa y jardín > Electrodomésticos: Control del clima; Secadoras de suelos y alfombras; Limpiadores de vapor de alfombras y suelos; Pulidoras de suelos; Secadores de futones; Teclados y mandos a distancia para puertas de garaje; Sistemas de apertura para puertas de garaje; Electrodomésticos para cuidado de la ropa; Aparatos de limpieza por ultrasonidos; Aspiradoras; Vaporizadores para papel pintado; Calentadores de agua
pl: Dom i ogród > Sprzęt AGD: Ogrzewanie, wentylacja i klimatyzacja; Suszarki do podłóg i dywanów; Myjki parowe do dywanów; Polerki i froterki do podłóg; Suszarki do futonów; Piloty i klawiatury do bram garażowych; Systemy napędowe do bram garażowych; Urządzenia do prania; Urządzenia czyszczące ultradźwiękami; Odkurzacze; Parowe odklejacze do tapet; Podgrzewacze wody
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kućanski aparati: Uređaji za kontrolu klime; Sušilice za podove i tepihe; Čistači i parni čistači za podove; Oprema za poliranje i laštenje; Sušilice za futon; Tipkovnice i daljinski upravljači za garažna vrata; Otvarači za garažna vrata; Uređaji za rublje; Ultrazvučni čistači; Usisivači; Parni čistači za tapete; Grijači za vodu